Utah statutes.
16-12-4.   Powers of real estate investment trust.

A real estate investment trust shall have power to sue and be sued, in its trust name, and to acquire title, lease, mortgage, convey or otherwise deal with real and personal property, or any interest therein in its trust name.



Enacted by Chapter 114, 1965 General Session

